Washington statutes.
RCW 9.92.110

Convicts protected—Forfeitures abolished.

Every person sentenced to imprisonment in any penal institution shall be under the protection of the law, and any unauthorized injury to his or her person shall be punished in the same manner as if he or she were not so convicted or sentenced. A conviction of crime shall not work a forfeiture of any property, real or personal, or of any right or interest therein. All forfeitures in the nature of deodands, or in case of suicide or where a person flees from justice, are abolished.

[ 2011 c 336 s 332; 1909 c 249 s 36; RRS s 2288.]

NOTES:

Inheritance rights of slayers or abusers: Chapter 11.84 RCW.